Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.201

Examination of milk and milk products—Violations—Director's options—Penalty.

(1) During any consecutive six-month period, at least four samples of: (a) Either raw milk or raw milk for pasteurization, or both, from each milk producer; or (b)(i) raw milk for pasteurization after receipt by the milk processing plant and prior to pasteurization; (ii) heat-treated milk products; and (iii) pasteurized milk and milk products from each milk processing plant shall be collected and examined in an official laboratory to determine compliance with bacteriological or cooling temperature standards for milk or milk products established in this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. However, in the case of raw milk for pasteurization, the director may accept the results of an officially designated laboratory.

(2) If a bacterial count, somatic cell count, coliform determination, or cooling temperature exceeds the standard, the director shall send written notice to the milk producer or milk processor. The director may initiate proceedings to degrade or suspend the milk producer's license or milk processing plant license and may assess a civil penalty whenever the standard is again violated.

[ 2013 c 7 s 1; 1999 c 291 s 12. Prior: 1994 c 143 s 401; 1994 c 46 s 11; 1989 c 354 s 17; 1981 c 297 s 1; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.110; prior: 1955 c 238 s 10; 1949 c 168 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-35. Formerly RCW 15.36.110.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1981 c 297: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 297 s 43.]